District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
43 act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Nurse Licensure Compact Authorization Act of
44 2025”.
45 Sec. 2. Findings and declaration of purpose.
46 The nurse licensure compact is enacted into law and entered into by the District, with all
47 other party states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:
48 “Sec. 1. Findings and Declaration of Purpose:
49 (a) The party states find that:
50 (1) The health and safety of the public are affected by the degree of compliance
51 with, and the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws;
52 (2) Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing
53 may result in injury or harm to the public;
54 (3) The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication
55 technologies as part of our nation’s health care delivery system require greater coordination and
56 cooperation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;
57 (4) New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual
58 state nurse licensure laws difficult and complex;
59 (5) The current system of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple
60 states is cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states; and
61 (6) Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout the states promotes
62 public safety and public health benefits.
63 (b) The general purposes of this Compact are to:
64 (1) Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the public’s health and safety;
2

65 (2) Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the areas of nurse
66 licensure and regulation;
67 (3) Facilitate the exchange of information between party states in the areas of
68 nurse regulation, investigation, and adverse actions;
69 (4) Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each
70 jurisdiction;
71 (5) Invest all party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for
72 meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is
73 rendered through the mutual recognition of party state licenses;
74 (6) Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses; and
75 (7) Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform
76 licensure requirements.
77 “Sec. 2. Definitions
78 As used in this Compact:
79 (1) “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action
80 permitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a
81 nurse, including actions against an individual’s license or multistate licensure privilege such as
82 revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s
83 practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse’s authorization to practice,
84 including issuance of a cease and desist action.
85 (2) “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring program
86 approved by a licensing board.
3

87 (3) “Coordinated licensure information system” means an integrated process for
88 collecting, storing, and sharing information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related
89 to nurse licensure laws, which is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and
90 controlled by licensing boards.
91 (4) “Current significant investigative information” means:
92 (A) Investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary
93 inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the nurse to respond, if required by state
94 law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
95 infraction; or
96 (B) Investigative information that indicates that the nurse represents an
97 immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has been notified
98 and had an opportunity to respond
99 (5) “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the
100 full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board.
101 (6) “Home state” means the party state that is the nurse’s primary state of
102 residence.
103 (7) “Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body responsible for
104 issuing nurse licenses.
105 (8) “Multistate license” means a license to practice as a registered nurse (RN) or a
106 licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that
107 authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege.
4

108 (9) “Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal authorization associated with a
109 multistate license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or a
110 licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) in a remote state.
111 (10) “Nurse” means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are defined by each party
112 state’s practice laws.
113 (11) “Party state” means any state that has adopted this Compact.
114 (12) “Remote state” means a party state, other than the home state.
115 (13) “Single-state license” means a nurse license issued by a party state that
116 authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure
117 privilege to practice in any other party state.
118 (14) “State” means a state, commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United
119 States, and the District of Columbia.
120 (15) “State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules, and regulations that
121 govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice, and create the methods and
122 grounds for imposing discipline. “State practice laws” do not include requirements necessary to
123 obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.
124 “Sec. 3. General provisions and jurisdiction.
125 (a) A multistate license to practice registered or licensed practical/vocational nursing
126 issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as
127 authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) or as a licensed practical/vocational
128 nurse (LPN/VN), under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party state.
129 (b) A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of
130 applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall
5

131 include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the
132 purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau
133 of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records.
134 (c) Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a
135 multistate license in the home state:
136 (1) Meets the home state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as
137 well as, all other applicable state laws;
138 (2)(A) Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved
139 RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program; or
140 (B) Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education
141 program that:
142 (i) has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in the
143 applicable country, and:
144 (ii) has been verified by an independent credentials review agency
145 to be comparable to a licensing board-approved prelicensure education program.
146 (3) Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure education program not taught in
147 English or if English is not the individual’s native language, successfully passed an English
148 proficiency examination that includes the components of reading, speaking, writing and
149 listening;
150 (4) Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN® or NCLEX-PN® Examination or
151 recognized predecessor, as applicable;
152 (5) Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license;
6

153 (6) Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or
154 licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining
155 criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency
156 responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records;
157 (7) Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed
158 disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law;
159 (8) Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed
160 disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-
161 by-case basis;
162 (9) Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;
163 (10) Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an
164 alternative program; and
165 (11) Has a valid United States Social Security number.
166 (d) All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law,
167 to take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege such as revocation,
168 suspension, probation or any other action that affects a nurse’s authorization to practice under a
169 multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a party state takes such
170 action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.
171 The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the
172 home state of any such actions by remote states.
173 (e) A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the
174 state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.
7

175 (1) The practice of nursing is not limited to patient care, but shall include all
176 nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is
177 located.
178 (2) The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege
179 will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party
180 state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.
181 (f) Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party
182 state’s single- state license as provided under the laws of each party state. However, the single-
183 state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to
184 practice nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
185 established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license.
186 (g) Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on the effective date of this
187 Compact, may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse’s then-current home
188 state, provided that:
189 (1) A nurse, who changes primary state of residence after this Compact’s effective
190 date, must meet all applicable Section 3(c) requirements to obtain a multistate license from a new
191 home state.
192 (2) A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in Section
193 3(c) due to a disqualifying event occurring after this Compact’s effective date shall be ineligible
194 to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse’s multistate license shall be revoked or
195 deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of Nurse
196 Licensure Compact Administrators (“Commission”).
197 “Sec. 4. Applications for licensure in a party state.
8

198 (a) Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state
199 shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has
200 ever held, or is the holder of, a license issued by any other state, whether there are any
201 encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any
202 adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the
203 applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program.
204 (b) A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one party
205 state at a time.
206 (c) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between two party states, the
207 nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the
208 prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the
209 Commission.
210 (A) The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of
211 residence.
212 (B) A multistate license shall not be issued by the new home state until the nurse
213 provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state
214 and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new home state.
215 (d) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a non-
216 party state, the multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single-state
217 license, valid only in the former home state.
218 “Sec. 5. Additional authorities invested in party state licensing boards.
219 (a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the
220 authority to:
9

221 (1) Take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice
222 within that party state.
223 (A) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action
224 against a nurse’s license issued by the home state.
225 (B) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board
226 shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as it
227 would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall
228 apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.
229 (2) Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse’s authority
230 to practice within that party state.
231 (3) Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of
232 residence during the course of such investigations. The licensing board shall also have the
233 authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of such
234 investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The
235 administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new
236 home state of any such actions.
237 (4) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
238 attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued
239 by a licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the
240 production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court
241 of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
242 subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness
10

243 fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which
244 the witnesses or evidence are located.
245 (5) Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other
246 biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background
247 checks, receive the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal
248 background checks and use the results in making licensure decisions.
249 (6) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected nurse the costs
250 of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that
251 nurse.
252 (7) Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided
253 that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.
254 (b) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a nurse’s multistate license, the
255 nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated until
256 all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license. All home state disciplinary
257 orders that impose adverse action against a nurse’s multistate license shall include a statement
258 that the nurse’s multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the
259 pendency of the order.
260 (c) Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state’s decision that participation in an
261 alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall
262 deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse for the
263 duration of the nurse’s participation in an alternative program.
264 “Sec. 6. Coordinated licensure information system and exchange of information.
11

265 (a) All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all
266 licensed registered nurses (RNs) and licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). This
267 system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as
268 submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts.
269 (b) The Commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure
270 information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification,
271 collection and exchange of information under this Compact.
272 (c) All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information
273 system any adverse action, any current significant investigative information, denials of
274 applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse participation in alternative programs
275 known to the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic or
276 confidential under state law.
277 (d) Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or
278 confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure
279 information system only to party state licensing boards.
280 (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards
281 contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate
282 information that may not be shared with non-party states or disclosed to other entities or
283 individuals without the express permission of the contributing state.
284 (f) Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure
285 information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with non-party states or
286 disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party
287 state contributing the information.
12

288 (g) Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is
289 subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that information
290 shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system.
291 (h) The Compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the
292 Compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:
293 (1) Identifying information;
294 (2) Licensure data;
295 (3) Information related to alternative program participation; and
296 (4) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact, as
297 determined by Commission rules.
298 (i) The Compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents
299 and information requested by another party state.
300 “Sec. 7. Establishment of the interstate commission of nurse licensure compact
301 administrators.
302 (a) The party states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the
303 Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators:
304 (1) The Commission is an instrumentality of the party states.
305 (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
306 be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office
307 of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
308 the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
309 (3) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
310 immunity.
13

311 (b) Membership, Voting and Meetings
312 (1) Each party state shall have and be limited to one administrator. The head of
313 the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this Compact for each party
314 state. Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the
315 state from which the Administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the Commission shall
316 be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists.
317 (2) Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard to the
318 promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to
319 participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. An administrator shall vote in person
320 or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an
321 administrator’s participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
322 (3) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
323 Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission.
324 (4) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be
325 given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Section 8.
326 (5) The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the
327 Commission must discuss:
328 (A) Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under the
329 Compact;
330 (B) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters,
331 practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the
332 Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;
333 (C) Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
14

334 (D) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or
335 real estate;
336 (E) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
337 (F) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that
338 is privileged or confidential;
339 (G) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would
340 constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
341 (H) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement
342 purposes;
343 (I) Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on
344 behalf of the Commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this Compact; or
345 (J) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state
346 statute.
347 (6) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the
348 Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
349 reference each relevant exempting provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
350 clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary
351 of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed. All
352 documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
353 minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a
354 majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
15

355 (c) The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or
356 rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and
357 exercise the powers of this Compact, including but not limited to:
358 (1) Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
359 (2) Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
360 (A) For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and
361 (B) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or
362 function of the Commission;
363 (3) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the
364 Commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity
365 for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to
366 protect the public’s interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including
367 trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the
368 administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the
369 Commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each
370 administrator, with no proxy votes allowed;
371 (4) Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for the
372 election of the officers of the Commission;
373 (5) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the
374 personnel policies and programs of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other
375 similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and
376 programs of the Commission; and
16

377 (6) Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the Commission and
378 the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this
379 Compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations;
380 (d) The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and any amendments thereto, in a
381 convenient form on the website of the Commission.
382 (e) The Commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
383 (f) The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
384 of this Compact and the bylaws.
385 (g) The Commission shall have the following powers:
386 (1) To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and
387 administration of this Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be
388 binding in all party states;
389 (2) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
390 Commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable
391 law shall not be affected;
392 (3) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
393 (4) To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
394 limited to, employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations;
395 (5) To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to
396 the regulation of nursing, including but not limited to sharing administrative or staff expenses,
397 office space or other resources;
398 (6) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
399 grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact, and to
17

400 establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
401 qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
402 (7) To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants and gifts of money,
403 equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same;
404 provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict
405 of interest;
406 (8) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to
407 own, hold, improve or use, any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided that at all
408 times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
409 (9) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise
410 dispose of any property, whether real, personal or mixed;
411 (10) To establish a budget and make expenditures;
412 (11) To borrow money;
413 (12) To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of
414 administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
415 representatives, and other such interested persons;
416 (13) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law
417 enforcement agencies;
418 (14) To adopt and use an official seal; and
419 (15) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
420 achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and
421 practice.
422 (h) Financing of the Commission:
18

423 (1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
424 expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
425 (2) The Commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from
426 each party state to cover the cost of its operations, activities and staff in its annual budget as
427 approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based
428 upon a formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is
429 binding upon all party states.
430 (3) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
431 funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of the party
432 states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state.
433 (4) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
434 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject to the audit
435 and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements
436 of funds handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public
437 accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report
438 of the Commission.
439 (i) Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification:
440 (1) The administrators, officers, executive director, employees and representatives
441 of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official
442 capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
443 caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the
444 person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the
445 scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this
19

446 paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage,
447 loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
448 (2) The Commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director,
449 employee or representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability
450 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
451 Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is
452 made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
453 employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to
454 prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further that the actual or
455 alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional, willful or wanton
456 misconduct.
457 (3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer,
458 executive director, employee or representative of the Commission for the amount of any
459 settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error
460 or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
461 responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
462 scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged
463 act, error or omission did not result from the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that
464 person.
465 “Sec. 8. Commission rulemaking.
466 (a) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth
467 in this Section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as
20

468 of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as
469 provisions of this Compact.
470 (b) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
471 the Commission.
472 (c) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the Commission, and at
473 least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted
474 upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
475 (1) On the website of the Commission, and;
476 (2) On the website of each licensing board or the publication in which each state
477 would otherwise publish proposed rules.
478 (d) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
479 (1) The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be
480 considered and voted upon;
481 (2) The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed
482 rule;
483 (3) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
484 (4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the Commission
485 of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
486 (e) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit
487 written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
488 (f) The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule
489 or amendment.
21

490 (g) The Commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public
491 hearing.
492 (1) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to
493 comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be
494 recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request.
495 (2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
496 each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by
497 this section.
498 (h) If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission may proceed with
499 promulgation of the proposed rule.
500 (i) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled
501 hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral
502 comments received.
503 (j) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the
504 proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking
505 record and the full text of the rule.
506 (k) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and
507 adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that
508 the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in this section shall be
509 retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90)
510 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is
511 one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
512 (A) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
22

513 (B) Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; or
514 (C) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is
515 required by federal law or rule.
516 (l) The Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for
517 purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or
518 grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
519 Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30)
520 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
521 material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the
522 Commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
523 effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect
524 without the approval of the Commission.
525 “Sec. 9. Oversight, dispute resolution, and enforcement.
526 (a) Oversight:
527 (1) Each party state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
528 appropriate to effectuate this Compact’s purposes and intent.
529 (2) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
530 proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission, and shall
531 have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of
532 process in such proceeding to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the
533 Commission, this Compact or promulgated rules.
534 (b) Default, technical assistance and termination
23

535 (1) If the Commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the
536 performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated rules,
537 the Commission shall:
538 (A) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of
539 the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default, or any other action to be
540 taken by the Commission; and
541 (B) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding
542 the default.
543 (2) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state’s membership
544 in this Compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators,
545 and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the
546 effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
547 obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
548 (3) Termination of membership in this Compact shall be imposed only after all
549 other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
550 terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor of the defaulting state and to the
551 executive officer of the defaulting state’s licensing board and each of the party states.
552 (4) A state whose membership in this Compact has been terminated is responsible
553 for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
554 including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
555 (5) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be
556 in default or whose membership in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in
557 writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
24

558 (6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning
559 the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the
560 Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
561 litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
562 (c) Dispute resolution:
563 (1) Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve
564 disputes related to the Compact that arise among party states and between party and non-party
565 states.
566 (2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and
567 binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.
568 (3) In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes among party states
569 arising under this Compact:
570 (A) The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration
571 panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the Compact administrator in each of
572 the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact administrators
573 of all the party states involved in the dispute.
574 (B) The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding.
575 (d) Enforcement:
576 (1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the
577 provisions and rules of this Compact.
578 (2) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the U.S. District
579 Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission has its
580 principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions
25

581 of this Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
582 injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
583 shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
584
585 (3) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission.
586 The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
587 “Sec. 10. Compact effective date, withdrawal, and amendment.
588 (a) This Compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of
589 legislative enactment of this Compact into law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or
590 December 31, 2018. All party states to this Compact, that also were parties to the prior Nurse
591 Licensure Compact, superseded by this Compact, (“Prior Compact”), shall be deemed to have
592 withdrawn from said Prior Compact within six (6) months after the effective date of this
593 Compact.
594 (b) Each party state to this Compact shall continue to recognize a nurse’s multistate
595 licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the Prior Compact until such party
596 state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.
597 (c) Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing the
598 same. A party state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the
599 repealing statute.
600 (d) A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement
601 of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant
602 investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.
26

603 (e) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
604 nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-
605 party state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this Compact.
606 (f) This Compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this Compact
607 shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the
608 laws of all party states.
609 (g) Representatives of non-party states Compact shall be invited to participate in the
610 activities of the Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this Compact by all
611 states.
612 “Sec. 11. Compact construction and severability
613 (a) This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The
614 provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of
615 this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United
616 States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held
617 invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any
618 government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall
619 be held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this Compact shall remain in full
620 force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state
621 affected as to all severable matters.”
622 Sec. 3. The Mayor is authorized to appoint, with the advice and consent of the Council
623 pursuant to section 2(f) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979, (D.C. Law 2-
624 142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(f)), one administrator to the Interstate Commission of Nurse
625 Licensure Compact Administrators, pursuant to section 7(b)(1) of the Nurse Licensure Compact
27

626 (“Compact”), enacted and entered into pursuant to section 2, and one alternate administrator,
627 who may exercise voting authority in the absence of one of the District’s Administrator, pursuant
628 to section 7(b)(1) of the Compact.
629 Sec. 4. Pursuant to the requirements of D.C. Official Code §§ 47-105 and 47-355.01 to
630 355.08, nothing in the Compact creates an obligation of the District in anticipation of an
631 appropriation for such purpose, and the District’s legal liability for the payment of any amount
632 under the Compact does not and may not arise or obtain in advance of the lawful availability of
633 appropriated funds for the applicable fiscal year.
634 Sec. 5 A multistate license to practice as an RN, LPN, or VN issued pursuant to the
635 Compact is an option for licensure in addition to a traditional license to practice as an RN, LPN,
636 or VN issued pursuant to Title V of the Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective
637 January 18, 1986, (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C Official Code § 3-1205.01 et seq.). The Board of
638 Nursing may charge a fee in excess of the traditional license fee for issuance of a multistate
639 license. The Board of Nursing shall not pass along to a traditional license applicant or holder any
640 costs associated with entering into or administering the Compact.
641 Sec. 6 Employer reporting and information requirements.
642 (a) A person or governmental entity that employs, or contracts directly or through another
643 person or governmental entity for the provision of services by a nurse holding a multistate
644 license to practice as an RN, LPN, or VN issued pursuant to the Compact shall:
645 (1) Report to the Board of Nursing the number of nurses holding multistate
646 licenses who are employed by, or providing services for, the person or governmental entity;
647 (2) Provide each nurse holding a multistate license a copy of Board-developed
648 information concerning laws and rules specific to the practice of nursing in the District;
28

649 (b) The Board of Nursing shall develop information concerning laws and rules specific to
650 the practice of nursing in the District and make that information available on its internet web site
651 (c) The Board of Nursing may adopt rules in accordance with this section.
652 Sec. 7 Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to limit, alter, or modify the following:
653 (1) Any of the terms, conditions, or provisions of a collective bargaining
654 agreement entered into by a hospital;
655 (2) The authority of the Board of Nursing to determine whether:
656 (A) An applicant for a traditional license to practice as a registered nurse
657 or as a licensed practical nurse issued pursuant to sections 503 through 506 of the Health
658 Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective January 18, 1986, (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C Official
659 Code § 3-1205.03 through 1205.06) meets the educational requirements therein;
660 (B) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse holding a license to
661 practice issued pursuant to Title V of the Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective
662 January 18, 1986, (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C Official Code § 3-1205 et seq.) has:
663 (i) Completed the continuing education required for renewal as
664 described in section 510 of the Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective January 18,
665 1986, (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C Official Code § 3-1205.10); or
666 (ii) Engaged in activities that exceed the practice of nursing as a
667 registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse.
668 Sec. 8. Fiscal impact statement.
669 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
670 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
671 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
29

672 Sec. 9. Effective date.
673 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
674 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
675 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
676 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
677 Columbia Register.
30